Utah statutes.
31A-8-402.5.   Individual discontinuance and nonrenewal.
(1) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a health benefit plan
offered on an individual basis is renewable and continues in force:
(i)  with respect to all individuals or dependents; and
(ii)  at the option of the individual.
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) applies regardless of:
(i)  whether the contract is issued through:
(A)  a trust;
(B)  an association;
(C)  a discretionary group; or
(D)  other similar grouping; or
(ii)  the situs of delivery of the policy or contract.
(2)  A health benefit plan may be discontinued or nonrenewed:
(a)  for a network plan, if:
(i)  the individual no longer lives, resides, or works in:
(A)  the service area of the insurer; or
(B)  the area for which the insurer is authorized to do business; and
(ii)  coverage is terminated uniformly without regard to any health status-
related factor relating to any covered individual; or
(b)  for coverage made available through an association, if:
(i)  the individual's membership in the association ceases; and
(ii)  the coverage is terminated uniformly without regard to any health
status-related factor relating to any covered individual.
(3)  A health benefit plan may be discontinued if:
(a)  a condition described in Subsection (2) exists;
(b)  the individual fails to pay premiums or contributions in accordance with
the terms of the health benefit plan, including any timeliness requirements;
(c)  the individual:
(i)  performs an act or practice in connection with the coverage that
constitutes fraud; or
(ii)  makes an intentional misrepresentation of material fact under the terms
of the coverage;
(d)  the insurer:
(i)  elects to discontinue offering a particular health benefit product
delivered or issued for delivery in this state; and
(ii) (A)  provides notice of the discontinuation in writing:
(I)  to each individual provided coverage; and
(II)  at least 90 days before the date the coverage will be discontinued;
(B)  provides notice of the discontinuation in writing:
(I)  to the commissioner; and
(II)  at least three working days prior to the date the notice is sent to the
affected individuals;
(C)  offers to each covered individual on a guaranteed issue basis, the option
to purchase all other individual health benefit products currently being
offered by the insurer for individuals in that market; and
(D)  acts uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of
covered individuals or dependents of covered individuals who may become
eligible for coverage; or
(e)  the insurer:
(i)  elects to discontinue all of the insurer's health benefit plans in the
individual market; and
(ii) (A)  provides notice of the discontinuation in writing:
(I)  to each individual provided coverage; and
(II)  at least 180 days before the date the coverage will be discontinued;
(B)  provides notice of the discontinuation in writing:
(I)  to the commissioner in each state in which an affected insured individual
is known to reside; and
(II)  at least 30 working days prior to the date the notice is sent to the
affected individuals;
(C)  discontinues and nonrenews all health benefit plans the insurer issues or
delivers for issuance in the individual market; and
(D)  acts uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of
covered individuals or dependents of covered individuals who may become
eligible for coverage.
